Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-1413
Vacancy; how filled.

In case of the sickness, death, discharge or nonattendance of any grand juror, after the grand jury shall be affirmed or sworn, it shall be lawful for the court, at its discretion to cause another to be sworn or affirmed in his stead.

G.S.1873, c. 58, § 404, p. 815;

R.S.1913, § 9043;

C.S.1922, § 10067;

C.S.1929, § 29-1413;

R.S.1943, § 29-1413.